Montana, session 2025, HB627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Report to interim committee. (1) By March 1, June 1, September 1, and December 1 of
each year, the department shall provide a written report to the legislative finance committee in accordance with
5-11-210 containing the information listed in subsection (2) that is related to procurement solicitations and
contracts and is available to the department in the department's information technology resources.
(2) The report must include:
(a) for a procurement solicitation for a contract that the department anticipates will cost at least
$250,000 $200,000 over the life of the contract:
(i) the name of each purchasing agency issuing the solicitation;
(ii) what the purchasing agency intends to procure through the solicitation;
(iii) the portion of the purchasing agency's appropriation that it intends to use to pay the vendor ;
(iv)(iii) the closing date of the solicitation; and
(v)(iv) any other information the department finds relevant to the proposal;
(b) for a contract executed with or without a solicitation that is expected to cost $250,000 $200,000
or more over the life of the contract:
(i) the names of the purchasing agency; and
(ii) the contractor and the date of execution; and
(c) for a contract modification that causes the total value of a contract to exceed $250,000
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 627
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 627
$200,000 over the life of the contract:
(i) the names of the purchasing agency; and
(ii) the contractor and the date of execution.
(3) By February 15, May 15, August 15, and November 15 of each year, each governmental body
shall submit the information listed in subsection (2) related to procurement solicitations and contracts to the
department using the information technology resources specified by the department.
Section 2. Report to interim committee. (1) By March 1, June 1, September 1, and December 1 of
each year, the department shall provide a written report to the legislative finance committee in accordance with
5-11-210 containing the information listed in subsection (2) related to procurement solicitations and contracts.
(2) The report must include:
(a) for a procurement solicitation for a contract that the department anticipates will cost at least
$200,000 over the life of the contract:
(i) the name of each purchasing agency issuing the solicitation;
(ii) what the purchasing agency intends to procure through the solicitation;
(iii) the portion of the purchasing agency's appropriation that it intends to use to pay the vendor;
(iv) the closing date of the solicitation; and
(v) any other information the department finds relevant to the proposal;
(b) for a contract executed with or without a solicitation that is expected to cost $200,000 or more
over the life of the contract:
(i) the names of the purchasing agency; and
(ii) the contractor and the date of execution; and
(c) for a contract modification that causes the total value of a contract to exceed $200,000 over the
life of the contract:
(i) the names of the purchasing agency; and
(ii) the contractor and the date of execution.
(3) By February 15, May 15, August 15, and November 15 of each year, each governmental body
shall submit the information listed in subsection (2) related to procurement solicitations and contracts to the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 627
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 627
department using the information technology resources specified by the department.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [ Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 18, chapter 4, part 1, and the provisions of Title 18, chapter 4, part 1, apply to [ sections 1 and 2].
Section 4. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is effective July 1,
2025.
(2) [Section 2] is effective July 1, 2026.
Section 5. Termination. [Section 1] terminates June 30, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 627
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 627, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 627
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT REVISING PROCUREMENT REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT
OF ADMINISTRATION TO PROVIDE CERTAIN REPORTS TO THE LEGISLATIVE FINANCE COMMITTEE ON
PROCUREMENT SOLICITATIONS, CONTRACTS, AND CONTRACT MODIFICATIONS; AND PROVIDING
EFFECTIVE DATES AND A TERMINATION DATE.”